Alabama, session 2026rs, HB555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Page 1

PROPOSED AMENDMENT
HB555 INTRODUCED
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022 to the contrary, The Alabama Department of
Economic and Community Affairs is authorized to provide
low-interest loans to qualifying chemical and energy
production facilities in the State of Alabama as part of the
State Energy Supply and Chemical Trade Stabilization Act.
(b) Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment,
the Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
election ballot and shall set forth the following description
of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
of 2022, to authorize the Alabama Department of Economic and
Community Affairs to provide low-interest loans to qualifying
chemical and energy production facilities in the State of
Page 2

chemical and energy production facilities in the State of
HB555 INTRODUCED
Alabama as part of the State Energy Supply and Chemical Trade
Stabilization Act.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3